New York, session 2025-2026, S2505.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Task force on educator diversity in New York state. There 2 is hereby established a task force on educator diversity in New York 3 state. The purpose of the task force shall be to conduct a comprehensive 4 study on the presence of educator diversity, state actions taken to 5 promote educator diversity in New York state, and how New York state can 6 encourage new initiatives to enhance and promote educator diversity, 7 including but not limited to: 8 (a) barriers which prevent students of color from entering the teach- 9 ing profession, or remaining in the teaching profession; 10 (b) recruitment and retention efforts; 11 (c) mentorship programs for current educators of color; 12 (d) initiatives aimed at encouraging students of color to enter the 13 teaching profession, also known as 'grow your own' initiatives; 14 (e) scholarship opportunities for students of color who are interested 15 in entering the teaching profession, and other funding mechanisms to 16 assist such students; 17 (f) initiatives that encourage teachers of color to become school 18 leaders and administrators, and barriers that have prevented teachers of 19 color from becoming school leaders and administrators; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06667-02-6 S. 2505--A 2 1 (g) reviewing and commenting on reports issued by the state education 2 department related to educator diversity. 3 § 2. a. The task force shall consist of fifteen members to be 4 appointed as follows: (i) five people appointed by the governor; (ii) 5 four people appointed by the temporary president of the senate; (iii) 6 four people appointed by the speaker of the assembly; (iv) one person 7 appointed by the minority leader of the senate; and (v) one person 8 appointed by the minority leader of the assembly. 9 b. The members of the task force shall designate one of the appointees 10 as the chair of the task force. All appointments of members of the task 11 force shall be made no later than thirty days after the effective date 12 of this act. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority. 13 The members of the task force shall receive no compensation for their 14 services, but shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses 15 incurred in the performance of their duties pursuant to this act. 16 § 3. The task force shall make a report to the governor and legisla- 17 ture of its findings, conclusions and recommendations on or before 18 December 31, 2027. 19 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately, and shall expire and be 20 deemed repealed January 31, 2028.